California statutes. Vehicle Code
 equipped with at least one amber combination clearance and side-marker lamp on the side visible from the front, side, and rear if the projection is near the front of the vehicle and at least one red lamp if the projection is near the rear of the vehicle.

(d) Clearance and side-marker lamps are not required on auxiliary dollies or on passenger vehicles other than a housecar.

(e) Clearance lamps shall be visible from all distances between 500 feet and 50 feet to the front or rear of the vehicle, and side-marker lamps shall be visible from all distances between 500 feet and 50 feet to the side of the vehicle.

(f) Clearance lamps shall, so far as is practicable, be mounted to indicate the extreme width of the vehicle. Side-marker lamps shall be mounted not lower than 15 inches on vehicles manufactured on and after
 January 1, 1968. Combination clearance and side-marker lamps required on loads shall be mounted so the lenses project to the outer extremity of the vehicle or load.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 446.)
-------------------------------------------

25100.1.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, an ambulance may be equipped with clearance and side-marker lamps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 616.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.

In addition to the lamps otherwise permitted by this chapter, any motor vehicle may be equipped with lamps on the sides thereof, visible from the side of the vehicle but not from the front or rear thereof, which lamps, together with mountings or receptacles, shall be set into depressions or recesses in the body of the vehicle and shall not protrude beyond or outside the body of the vehicle. The light source in each of the lamps shall not exceed two candlepower and shall emit diffused light of any color, except that the color red is permitted only on authorized emergency vehicles.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.5.

(a) A schoolbus may be equipped with lamps mounted so as to be visible from the sides of the bus which may be lighted, in addition to other required lights, when, and only when, atmospheric conditions such as fog, rain, snow, smoke, or dust, reduce the visibility of other vehicles to less than 500 feet.

(b) The type and mounting requirements of such lamps shall be established by regulations adopted by the department. The regulations shall be adopted by January 1, 1980.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.

Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends from the left side of the vehicle one foot or more, there shall be displayed at the extreme left side of the load during darkness:

(a) An amber lamp plainly visible for 300 feet to the front and rear of the vehicle.

(b) An amber lamp at the front visible for 300 feet to the front and a red lamp at the rear plainly visible for 300 feet to the rear of the vehicle if the projecting load exceeds 120 inches in length.

The lamp shall not contain a
 bulb rated in excess of six candlepower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 774, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25104.

(a) Any vehicle or equipment that requires a permit issued pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 35780) of Chapter 5 of Division 15 because it is wider than permitted under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35100) of Division 15 shall display a solid red or fluorescent orange flag or cloth not less than 18 inches square at the extremities of the vehicle or equipment, if the vehicle or equipment is being operated other than during darkness.

(b) Any vehicle defined in Section 34500 transporting a load that extends beyond the sides of the vehicle by more than four inches shall also comply with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 50.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25105.

(a) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with running board or door-mounted courtesy lamps. The bulbs in the lamps shall not exceed six standard candlepower and shall emit either a green or white light without glare. The beams of the lamps shall not be visible to the front or rear of the vehicle.

(b) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with inside door-mounted red lamps or red reflectorizing devices or material visible to the rear of the vehicle when the doors are open. The bulbs
 in the lamps shall not exceed six standard candlepower.

(c) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with exterior lamps for the purpose of lighting the entrances and exits of the vehicles, which lamps may be lighted only when the vehicles are not in motion. The lamp source of the exterior lamps shall not exceed 32 standard candlepower, or 30 watts, nor project any glaring light into the eyes of an approaching driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25106.

(a) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with lighted white or amber cowl or fender lamps on the front. Any vehicle may be equipped with not more than one amber side lamp on each side near the front, nor more than one red side lamp on each side near the rear. The light source of each such lamp shall not exceed four standard candlepower.

(b) Lamps meeting requirements established by the department for side-marker or combination clearance and side-marker lamps may be installed on the sides of vehicles at any location, but any lamp installed within 24 inches of the rear of the vehicle shall
 be red, and any lamp installed at any other location shall be amber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

25107.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two cornering lamps designed and of sufficient intensity for the purpose of revealing objects only in the direction of turn while the vehicle is turning or while the turn signal lamps are operating to signal an intention to turn. The lamps shall be designed so that no glaring light is projected into the eyes of an approaching driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1313.)
-------------------------------------------

25108.

(a) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two amber turn-signal pilot indicators mounted on the exterior. The light output from any indicator shall not exceed five candlepower unless a provision is made for operating the indicator at reduced intensity during darkness in which event the light output shall not exceed five candlepower during darkness or 15 candlepower at any other time. The center of the beam shall be projected toward the driver.

(b) Any vehicle
 may be equipped with pilot indicators visible from the front to monitor the functioning or condition of parts essential to the operation of the vehicle or of equipment attached to the vehicle that is necessary for protection of the cargo or load. The pilot indicators shall be steady-burning, having a projected lighted lens area of not more than three-quarters of a square inch and have a light output of not more than five candlepower. The pilot indicator may be of any color except red.

(c) Other exterior pilot indicators of any color may be used for monitoring exterior lighting devices, provided that the area of each indicator is less than 0.20 square inches, the intensity of each indicator does not exceed 0.10 candlepower, and the color red is not visible to the front.

(d) Any towed vehicle may be equipped with an exterior-mounted indicator lamp used only to indicate the
 functional status of an antilock braking system providing that either of the following conditions are met:

(1) The indicator lamp complies with the applicable requirements of the federal motor vehicle safety standards.

(2) The indicator lamp is designed and located so that it will be readily visible, with the assistance of a rearview mirror if necessary, to the driver of the towing motor vehicle and the indicator lamp has a light source not exceeding five candlepower. The light shall not show to the sides or rear of the vehicle and the indicator lamp may emit any color except red.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two exterior-lighted data monitors that transmit information to the driver of the vehicle regarding the efficient
 or safe operation, or both the efficient and safe operation, of the vehicle.

(2) Data monitors shall comply with all of the following conditions:

(A) Be mounted to the vehicle in a manner so that they are readily visible to the driver of the vehicle when the driver is seated in the normal driving position. Data monitors shall not be designed to convey information to any person other than the driver of the vehicle.

(B) Be limited in size to not more than two square inches of lighted area each.

(C) Not emit a light brighter than reasonably necessary to convey the intended information.

(D) Not project a glaring light to the driver or, to other motorists, or to any other person.

(3) Data monitors may incorporate flashing or changing elements only as necessary to convey the intended information. Data monitors shall not resemble any official traffic-control device or required lighting device or be combined with any required lighting device.

(4) Data monitors may display any color, except that the color red shall not be visible to the front of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25109.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with two white or amber running lamps mounted on the front, one at each side, which shall not be lighted during darkness except while the motor vehicle is parked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 858.)
-------------------------------------------

25110.

(a) The following vehicles may be equipped with utility flood or loading lamps mounted on the rear, and sides, that project a white light illuminating an area to the side or rear of the vehicle for a distance not to exceed 75 feet at the level of the roadway:

(1) Tow trucks that are used to tow disabled vehicles may display utility floodlights, but only during the period of preparation for towing at the location from which a disabled vehicle is to be towed.

(2) Ambulances used to respond to emergency calls may display utility flood and loading lights, but only at the scene of an emergency or while loading or unloading patients.

(3) Firefighting equipment designed and operated exclusively as such may display utility floodlamps only at the scene of an emergency.

(4) Vehicles used by law enforcement agencies or organizations engaged in the detoxification of alcoholics may display utility flood or loading lights when loading or unloading persons under the influence of intoxicants for transportation to detoxification centers or places of incarceration.

(5) Vehicles used by law enforcement agencies for mobile blood alcohol testing, drug evaluation, or field sobriety testing .

(6) Vehicles used by publicly or privately owned public utilities may display utility flood or loading lights when engaged in emergency roadside repair of electric, gas, telephone, telegraph, water, or sewer facilities.

(b) Lamps permitted under subdivision (a) shall not be lighted during darkness, except while the vehicle is parked, nor project any glaring light into the eyes of an approaching driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Flashing and Colored Lights [25250. - 25282.]

25250.

Flashing lights are prohibited on vehicles except as otherwise permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 223.)
-------------------------------------------

25251.

(a) Flashing lights are permitted on vehicles as follows:

(1) To indicate an intention to turn or move to the right or left upon a roadway, turn signal lamps and turn signal exterior pilot indicator lamps and side lamps permitted under Section 25106 may be flashed on the side of a vehicle toward which the turn or movement is to be made.

(2) When disabled or parked off the roadway but within 10 feet of the
 roadway, or when approaching, stopped at, or departing from, a railroad grade crossing, turn signal lamps may be flashed as warning lights if the front turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously and the rear turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously.

(3) To warn other motorists of accidents or hazards on a roadway, turn signal lamps may be flashed as warning lights while the vehicle is approaching, overtaking, or passing the accident or hazard on the roadway if the front turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously and the rear turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously.

(4) For use on authorized emergency vehicles.

(5) To warn other motorists of a funeral procession, turn signal lamps may be flashed as warning lights on all vehicles
 actually engaged in a funeral procession, if the front turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously and the rear turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously.

(b) Turn signal lamps shall be flashed as warning lights whenever a vehicle is disabled upon the roadway and the vehicle is equipped with a device to automatically activate the front turn signal lamps at each side to flash simultaneously and the rear turn signal lamps at each side to flash simultaneously, if the device and the turn signal lamps were not rendered inoperative by the event which caused the vehicle to be disabled.

(c) Side lamps permitted under Section 25106 and used in conjunction with turn signal lamps may be flashed with the turn signal lamps as part of the warning light system, as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) Required or permitted lamps on a trailer or semitrailer may flash when the trailer or semitrailer has broken away from the towing vehicle and the connection between the vehicles is broken.

(e) Hazard warning lights, as permitted by paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) may be flashed in a repeating series of short and long flashes when the driver is in need of help.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 945, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25251.1.

Any implement of husbandry displaying a slow moving vehicle emblem, as defined in Section 24615, and being operated at a speed of 25 miles per hour or less, may be equipped with double-faced amber turn signals which may be flashed simultaneously as warning lights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 252.)
-------------------------------------------

25251.2.

Any motorcycle may be equipped with a means of modulating the upper beam of the headlamp between a high and a lower brightness at a rate of 200 to 280 flashes per minute. Such headlamps shall not be so modulated during darkness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 35, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

25251.3.

No civil liability shall attach to any person for the use or nonuse of turn signal lamps in the manner permitted by paragraph (3) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 25251, except for such civil liability as would attach for the use or nonuse of any other device required by this article or Article 8 (commencing with Section 25300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25251.4.

Any motor vehicle may also be equipped with a theft alarm system which flashes any of the lights required or permitted on the motor vehicle and which operates as specified in Article 13 (commencing with Section 28085) of Chapter 5 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

25251.5.

(a) Any motor vehicle may also be equipped with a system in which an amber light is center mounted on the rear of a vehicle to communicate a component of deceleration of the vehicle, and which light pulses in a controlled fashion at a rate which varies exponentially with a component of deceleration.

(b) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with two amber lamps on the rear of the vehicle which operate simultaneously with not more than four flashes within four seconds after the accelerator pedal is in the deceleration position and which are not lighted at any other time.
 The lamps shall be mounted at the same height, with one lamp located on each side of the vertical centerline of the vehicle, not higher than the bottom of the rear window, or if the vehicle has no rear window, not higher than 60 inches. The light output from each of the lamps shall not exceed 200 candlepower at any angle horizontal or above. The amber lamps may be used either separately or in combination with another lamp.

(c) Any stoplamp or supplemental stoplamp required or permitted by Section 24603 may be equipped so as to flash not more than four times within the first four seconds after actuation by application of the brakes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 410, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25252.

Every authorized emergency vehicle shall be equipped with at least one steady burning red warning lamp visible from at least 1,000 feet to the front of the vehicle to be used as provided in this code.

In addition, authorized emergency vehicles may display revolving, flashing, or steady red warning lights to the front, sides or rear of the vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 635.)
-------------------------------------------

25252.5.

(a) Every authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with a system which flashes the upper-beam headlamps of the vehicle with the flashes occurring alternately from the front headlamp on one side of the vehicle to the front headlamp on the other side of the vehicle. The flashing of the headlamps shall consist only of upper-beam flashing, and not the flashing of any other light beam. 

(b) “Upper-beam headlamp,” as used in this section, means a headlamp or that part of a headlamp which projects a distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of such
 intensity as to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least 350 feet ahead for all conditions of loading.

(c) The system provided for in subdivision (a) shall only be used when an authorized emergency vehicle is being operated pursuant to Section 21055.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1017, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

25253.

(a) Tow trucks used to tow disabled vehicles shall be equipped with flashing amber warning lamps. This subdivision does not apply to a tractor-trailer combination.

(b) Tow trucks may display flashing amber warning lamps while providing service to a disabled vehicle. A flashing amber warning lamp upon a tow truck may be displayed to the rear
 when the tow truck is towing a vehicle and moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(c) A tow truck shall not display flashing amber warning lamps on a freeway except when an unusual traffic hazard or extreme hazard exists.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 375, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2009, Ch. 33, Sec. 2.   (SB 159)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25253.1.

An automobile dismantler’s tow vehicle used to tow a disabled vehicle may be equipped with flashing amber warning lamps.

A flashing amber warning lamp upon an automobile dismantler’s tow vehicle may be displayed to the rear when the automobile dismantler’s tow vehicle is towing a vehicle and moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 710, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

25256.

Vehicles used by highway authorities or bridge and highway districts, and vehicles of duly authorized representatives thereof, used in highway maintenance, inspection, survey or construction work may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides or rear when such vehicles are parked or working on the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

25257.

(a) Every schoolbus, when operated for the transportation of schoolchildren, shall be equipped with a flashing red light signal system.

(b) (1) Every schoolbus manufactured on or after September 1, 1992, shall also be equipped with a stop signal arm. Any schoolbus manufactured before September 1, 1992, may be equipped with a stop signal arm.

(2) Any schoolbus manufactured on or after July
 1, 1993, shall also be equipped with an amber warning light system, in addition to the flashing red light signal system. Any schoolbus manufactured before July 1, 1993, may be equipped with an amber warning light system.

(3) On or before September 1, 1992, the department shall adopt regulations governing the specifications, installation, and use of stop signal arms, to comply with federal standards.

(4) A “stop signal arm” is a device that can be extended outward from the side of a schoolbus to provide a signal to other motorists not to pass the bus because it has stopped to load or unload passengers, that is manufactured pursuant to the specifications of Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 131, issued on April 25, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 624, Sec. 7.   Effective September 14, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

25257.2.

If a schoolbus is used for the transportation of persons of any age who are developmentally disabled, as defined by the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the amber light signal system, flashing red light signal system, and stop signal arm shall not be used other than as required by Sections 22112 and 22454.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 624, Sec. 8.   Effective September 14, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

25257.5.

To warn other motorists or pedestrians on a roadway during a backing maneuver, the operator of a schoolbus may flash turn signal lamps if the front turn signal lamps at each side are flashed simultaneously and the rear signal lamps at each side are flashed simultaneously.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25257.7.

(a) A schoolbus may be equipped with a white strobe light mounted so as to be visible from the front, sides, or rear of the bus. The strobe light may only be lighted when visibility is reduced to 500 feet or less due to atmospheric conditions including, but not limited to, fog, rain, snow, smoke, or dust. Reduced visibility due to atmospheric conditions does not include the time of darkness from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise.

(b) The type and mounting requirements of strobe lights authorized by subdivision (a)
 shall be established by regulations adopted by the department by April 1, 1991. No schoolbus shall be equipped with a strobe light until the regulations are adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 169, Sec. 1.   Effective June 22, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

25258.

(a) An authorized emergency vehicle operating under the conditions specified in Section 21055 may display a flashing white light from a gaseous discharge lamp designed and used for the purpose of controlling official traffic control signals.

(b) (1) An authorized emergency vehicle used by a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 of, subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (i) of Section 830.2 of, subdivision (n) of Section 830.3 of, subdivision (b) of Section 830.31 of, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.32 of, Section 830.33 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.36 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.4 of, or Section 830.6 of, or a probation officer, as defined in Section 830.5 of, the Penal Code, in the performance of the peace
 officer’s duties, may, in addition, display a steady or flashing blue warning light visible from the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle.

(2) Before a probation officer operates an emergency vehicle with a blue warning light, the officer shall complete a four-hour classroom training course regarding the operation of emergency vehicles that is certified by the Standards and Training for Corrections Division of the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(3) This subdivision does not expand any existing authority of a probation officer to conduct a high-speed vehicle pursuit, nor does it change any existing training requirements for high-speed vehicle pursuits.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a vehicle shall not be equipped with a device that emits any illumination or radiation that is designed or used
 for the purpose of controlling official traffic control signals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 211.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25259.

(a) Any authorized emergency vehicle may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear.

(b) A vehicle operated by a police or traffic officer while in the actual performance of his or her duties may display steady burning or flashing white lights to either side mounted above the roofline of the vehicle.

(c) Any authorized emergency vehicle may display not more than two flashing white
 warning lights to the front mounted above the roofline of the vehicle and not more than two flashing white warning lights to the front mounted below the roofline of the vehicle. These lamps may be in addition to the flashing headlamps permitted under Section 25252.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 945, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25259.1.

(a) Any vehicle operated by a disaster service worker who has received training in accordance with subdivision (b) and used by that worker in the performance of emergency or disaster services ordered by lawful authority during a state of war emergency, a state of emergency, or a local emergency, as those terms are defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear while at the scene of the emergency or disaster.

(b)Any disaster service worker operating a vehicle that displays flashing amber warning lights shall receive a training course from the public agency, disaster council, or emergency organization described in Section 3101 of the Government Code concerning the safe operation of the use of flashing amber warning lights prior to operating a vehicle that displays flashing amber warning lights.

(c) A person operating a vehicle that is authorized to display flashing amber warning lights under this section shall either completely cover or remove those lights when the lights are not in use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25259.5.

An emergency response or disaster service vehicle owned or leased and operated by the American National Red Cross, or any chapter or branch thereof, and equipped and clearly marked as a Red Cross emergency service or disaster service vehicle, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle while at the scene of an emergency or disaster operation. Vehicles not used on emergency response shall not be included.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25260.

(a) Public utility vehicles, and vehicles of duly authorized representatives of a public utility, actually engaged in the construction, removal, maintenance, or inspection of public utility facilities, including the cutting or trimming of trees immediately adjacent thereto, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear when necessarily parked on a highway or when moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(b) Vehicles owned by public transit operators which provide assistance to a disabled district
 bus may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear when necessarily parked on a highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 399, Sec. 5.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

25260.1.

Vehicles actually engaged in the construction, removal, maintenance, or inspection of any oil or gas pipeline may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear when necessarily parked on a highway or when necessarily moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic and only in accordance with Section 25268.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 120.)
-------------------------------------------

25260.3.

Any vehicle having personnel aerial lift equipment, actually engaged in the construction, removal, maintenance or inspection of any building, structure, or appurtenances thereto, including the cutting or trimming of trees immediately adjacent thereto, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear when necessarily parked on a highway or when moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of the traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 334.)
-------------------------------------------

25260.4.

Any hazardous substance spill response vehicle, under contract to the Department of Transportation for the cleanup of hazardous substance spills, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle while it is engaged in the actual cleanup of the spill. The warning lights shall be removed or covered with opaque material whenever the vehicle is not actually engaged in the cleanup of a hazardous substance at the scene of the spill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 887, Sec. 1.   Effective September 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

25261.

Vehicles used by a county or county department of agriculture and vehicles of duly authorized representatives thereof, actually engaged in weed control or pest detection, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear when necessarily parked on a highway or when moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

25262.

An armored car may be equipped with red lights which may be used while resisting armed robbery. At all other times the red lights shall not be lighted. The authority to use red lights granted by this section does not constitute an armored car an authorized emergency vehicle, and all other provisions of this code applicable to drivers of vehicles apply to drivers of armored cars.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

25263.

Trucks actually engaged in the towing of houses or buildings upon any highway may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides or rear on the vehicle or load.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25264.

Any motor vehicle operated by a coroner, or by a deputy coroner, and which is at the scene of any violent highway death, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front or rear.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25265.

Repair vehicles of sanitary districts or county sanitation districts necessarily parked other than adjacent to the curb in a highway for purposes of repairing district facilities, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides or rear, but these lights shall not be lighted when the vehicle is in motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25266.

Vehicles owned by the state and operated by officers or employees of the state who are actually engaged in aqueduct or levee construction, maintenance, patrol, or inspection, or in stream measurement work, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides and rear when parked on the traveled roadway so as to partially obstruct the free flow of traffic, or when moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 763.)
-------------------------------------------

25267.

Vehicles used by mosquito abatement districts or pest abatement districts when dispersing insecticides may display flashing amber warning lights to the front or rear while the vehicles are parked or working on the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25268.

No person shall display a flashing amber warning light on a vehicle as permitted by this code except when an unusual traffic hazard exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25269.

No person shall display a flashing or steady burning red warning light on a vehicle except as permitted by Section 21055 or when an extreme hazard exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25270.

Any pilot car required by the permit referred to in Section 35780 or 35790, or any vehicle or combination of vehicles subject to the permit if specified in the permit, shall be equipped with flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides or rear. The pilot car and any vehicles required by the permit to have flashing amber warning lights, shall display the flashing amber warning lights while actually engaged in the movement described in the permit. The warning lamps shall be removed or covered with opaque material whenever the pilot car is not escorting the movement described in the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25270.5.

Any motor vehicle engaged in, or aiding in, the herding of livestock along or across a public roadway may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle while it is stopped in the roadway near the livestock or is proceeding with the livestock along the roadway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 287.)
-------------------------------------------

25271.

Any publicly owned vehicle or any vehicle operated by a corporation incorporated under Part 4 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code for the purpose of the prevention of cruelty to animals, when used for removing dead animals, injured animals, or loose livestock, may, display flashing amber warning lights to the front or rear when necessarily parked on the roadway or when moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25271.5.

Any publicly owned vehicle used for the enforcement of animal control laws contained in a statute, local ordinance, or regulation may display flashing or revolving amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle when actually engaged in the enforcement of those laws and when necessarily parked on a roadway or moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25272.

A motor vehicle used by a rural mail carrier may display flashing amber warning lights to the front and rear of the vehicle while the vehicle is necessarily stopped or stopping upon a roadway for the delivery of United States mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25273.

Any motor vehicle owned and operated by a school district with an average daily attendance in excess of 400,000 while being used to measure the distance from school to a school pupil’s residence may display a flashing amber warning light to the rear of the vehicle when moving at a speed substantially slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

25274.

Any vehicle owned by a cable television company and operated by employees, or duly authorized representatives, of a cable television company, when actually engaged in the construction, removal, maintenance or inspection of cable television facilities, including but not limited to, the cutting or trimming of trees immediately adjacent thereto, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear when necessarily parked on a highway or when moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

For the purposes of this section, “cable television company” means any person engaged in the business of transmitting
 television programs by cable to subscribers for a fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 406.)
-------------------------------------------

25275.

Any truck or truck tractor which is primarily used in the transportation of loads specified in subdivision (a) of Section 35414, may be equipped with a flashing amber warning lamp. Such lamp may be displayed to the front, sides, or rear of the combination only when its length exceeds 75 feet and when an unusual traffic hazard exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

25275.5.

Any bus operated either by a public agency or under the authority of a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Public Utilities Commission may be equipped with a system of crime alarm lights. The system of crime alarm lights shall consist of the installation of additional lamp sources, not exceeding 32 standard candlepower or 30 watts, in the front and rear clearance lamps required or permitted by Section 25100. Such lamps shall be operated by a flasher unit or units that are not audible inside the bus. When actuated, both rear crime alarm lights shall flash simultaneously and both front crime alarm lights shall flash simultaneously. Crime alarm
 lights shall be actuated only when a crime is in progress on board the bus or has recently been committed on board the bus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

25276.

(a) A motor vehicle designed for carrying more than eight persons, including the driver, owned by a private, nonprofit organization that provides training or other activities for persons who have intellectual or physical disabilities, or both, and that is certified by the Department of Rehabilitation or licensed by the State Department of Developmental Services, with respect to the providing of this training or other activities, may be equipped with a flashing amber light signal system.

(b) A motor vehicle, described in subdivision (a), may, while actually engaged in the transportation of persons described in subdivision (a) to or from a training or activity center operated by the
 organization, display the flashing amber lights of the system when necessarily parked upon a highway and in the process of loading or unloading persons.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) apply to a motor vehicle that is rented, leased, or chartered by the organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 45.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25277.
